Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.100

Rates to be posted.

Every person licensed to keep a ferry shall post up, in some conspicuous place near his or her ferry landing a list of the rates of ferriage which are chargeable by law at such ferry, which list of rates shall at all times be plain and legible and posted up so near the place where persons pass across the ferry that it may be easily read. If the keeper neglects or refuses to post and keep up such list, it shall not be lawful to charge or take any ferriage or compensation at the ferry, during the time of such delinquency.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4089; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.100. Prior: Code 1881 s 3011; 1879 p 63 s 47; 1869 p 283 s 49; 1863 p 523 s 9; 1854 p 355 s 9; RRS s 5471.]